Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-9] Design claim conciliation panel
hearing; decisions. (a) Within thirty days after the completion of a
hearing, the design claim conciliation panel shall file a written advisory
decision with the department and shall thereupon mail copies to all parties
concerned, and their counsel. The panel shall decide the issue of liability
and shall state its conclusions in writing.

(b) After a finding of liability, the design
claim conciliation panel shall decide the amount of damages, if any, which should
be awarded in the case. The decision as to damages shall include in simple,
concise terms a division as to which portion of the damages recommended are
attributable to the design professional, economic losses and noneconomic losses;
provided the panel may not recommend punitive damages.

(c) The decision shall be signed by all
members of the design claim conciliation panel; provided that any member of the
panel may file a written concurring or dissenting opinion.

(d) The advisory decision required by this
section need not be filed if the claim is settled or otherwise disposed of
before the decision is written or filed. [L 2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next